Colorado statutes. TITLE 1 Elections
ARTICLE 40 INITIATIVE AND REFERENDUM
1-40-130. Unlawful acts - penalty.

It is unlawful:

For any person willfully and knowingly to circulate or cause to be circulated or sign or procure to be signed any petition bearing the name, device, or motto of any person, organization, association, league, or political party, or purporting in any way to be endorsed, approved, or submitted by any person, organization, association, league, or political party, without the written consent, approval, and authorization of the person, organization, association, league, or political party;

For any person to sign any name other than his or her own to any petition or knowingly to sign his or her name more than once for the same measure at one election;

For any person to knowingly sign any petition who is not a registered elector at the time of signing the same;

For any person to sign any affidavit as circulator without knowing or reasonably believing the statements made in the affidavit to be true;

For any person to certify that an affidavit attached to a petition was subscribed or sworn to before him or her unless it was so subscribed and sworn to before him or her and unless the person so certifying is duly qualified under the laws of this state to administer an oath;

For any officer or person to do willfully, or with another or others conspire, or agree, or confederate to do, any act which hinders, delays, or in any way interferes with the calling, holding, or conducting of any election permitted under the initiative and referendum powers reserved by the people in section 1 of article V of the state constitution or with the registering of electors therefor;

For any officer to do willfully any act which shall confuse or tend to confuse the issues submitted or proposed to be submitted at any election, or refuse to submit any petition in the form presented for submission at any election;

For any officer or person to violate willfully any provision of this article;

For any person to pay money or other things of value to a registered elector for the purpose of inducing the elector to withdraw his or her name from a petition for a ballot issue;

For any person to certify an affidavit attached to a petition in violation of section 1-40-111 (2)(b)(I);

For any person to sign any affidavit as a circulator, unless each signature in the petition section to which the affidavit is attached was affixed in the presence of the circulator;

For any person to circulate in whole or in part a petition section, unless such person is the circulator who signs the affidavit attached to the petition section.

Any person, upon conviction of a violation of any provision of this section, shall be punished by a fine of not more than one thousand five hundred dollars, or by imprisonment for not more than one year in the county jail, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 694, § 1, effective May 4.

L. 2009:

(1)(h) and (2) amended and (1)(i), (1)(j), (1)(k), and (1)(l) added, (HB 09-1326), ch. 258, p. 1178, § 16, effective May 15.

Editor's note:

Subsection (1) is similar to former § 1-40-118 (2), and subsection (2) is similar to former § 1-40-118 (3), as they existed prior to 1993.

1-40-131. Tampering with initiative or referendum petition.

Any person who willfully destroys, defaces, mutilates, or suppresses any initiative or referendum petition or who willfully neglects to file or delays the delivery of the initiative or referendum petition or who conceals or removes any initiative or referendum petition from the possession of the person authorized by law to have the custody thereof, or who adds, amends, alters, or in any way changes the information on the petition as provided by the elector, or who aids, counsels, procures, or assists any person in doing any of said acts upon conviction shall be punished as provided in section 1-13-111. The language in this section does not preclude a circulator from striking a complete line on the petition if the circulator believes the line to be invalid.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 695, § 1, effective May 4.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3132, § 49, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-40-118.5 as it existed prior to 1993.

1-40-132. Enforcement.

The secretary of state is charged with the administration and enforcement of the provisions of this article relating to initiated or referred measures and state constitutional amendments. The secretary of state shall have the authority to promulgate rules as may be necessary to administer and enforce any provision of this article that relates to initiated or referred measures and state constitutional amendments. The secretary of state may conduct a hearing, upon a written complaint by a registered elector, on any alleged violation of the provisions relating to the circulation of a petition, which may include but shall not be limited to the preparation or signing of an affidavit by a circulator. If the secretary of state, after the hearing, has reasonable cause to believe that there has been a violation of the provisions of this article relating to initiated or referred measures and state constitutional amendments, he or she shall notify the attorney general, who may institute a criminal prosecution. If a circulator is found to have violated any provision of this article or is otherwise shown to have made false or misleading statements relating to his or her section of the petition, such section of the petition shall be deemed void.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 95, p. 439, § 22, effective May 8, 1995.)

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 695, § 1, effective May 4.

L. 95:

Entire section amended, p. 439, § 22, effective May 8.

Editor's note:

Subsection (1) is similar to former § 1-40-119 as it existed prior to 1993.

1-40-133. Retention of petitions.

After a period of three years from the time of submission of the petitions to the secretary of state, if it is determined that the retention of the petitions is no longer necessary, the secretary of state may destroy the petitions.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 696, § 1, effective May 4.

L. 95:

Entire section amended, p. 439, § 23, effective May 8.

1-40-134. Withdrawal of initiative petition.

The designated representatives of the proponents of an initiative petition may withdraw the petition from consideration as a ballot issue by filing a letter with the secretary of state requesting that the petition not be placed on the ballot. The letter shall be signed and acknowledged by both designated representatives before an officer authorized to take acknowledgments and shall be filed no later than sixty days prior to the election at which the initiative is to be voted upon.

Source:

L. 98:

Entire section added, p. 632, § 1, effective May 6.

L. 2009:

Entire section amended, (HB 09-1326), ch. 258, p. 1179, § 17, effective May 15.

1-40-135. Petition entities - requirements - definition.

As used in this section, "petition entity" means any person or issue committee that directly or indirectly provides compensation to a circulator to circulate a ballot petition.

It is unlawful for any petition entity to provide compensation to a circulator to circulate a petition without first obtaining a license therefor from the secretary of state. The secretary of state may deny a license if he or she finds that the petition entity or any of its principals have been found, in a judicial or administrative proceeding, to have violated the petition laws of Colorado or any other state and such violation involves authorizing or knowingly permitting any of the acts set forth in subsection (2)(c) of this section, or to have knowingly contracted with a petition entity that has been found, in a judicial or administrative proceeding, to have authorized or knowingly permitted any of the acts set forth in subsection (2)(c) of this section. The secretary of state shall deny a license:

Repealed.

If no current representative of the petition entity has completed the training related to potential fraudulent activities in petition circulation, as established by the secretary of state, pursuant to section 1-40-112 (3).

Repealed.

The secretary of state shall revoke the petition entity license if, at any time after receiving a license, a petition entity is determined to no longer be in compliance with the requirements set forth in subsection (2)(a) of this section or if the petition entity authorized or knowingly permitted:

Forgery of a registered elector's signature;

Circulation of a petition section, in whole or part, by anyone other than the circulator who signs the affidavit attached to the petition section;

Use of a false circulator name or address in the affidavit;

Payment of money or other things of value to any person for the purpose of inducing the person to sign or withdraw his or her name from the petition; or

Repealed.

A notary public's notarization of a petition section outside of the presence of the circulator or without the production of the required identification for notarization of a petition section.

The secretary of state shall revoke the petition entity license, if, at any time after receiving a license, a petition entity is determined to have knowingly contracted with a petition entity that violated a provision of subsections (2)(c)(I) to (2)(c)(VI) of this section.

Any procedures by which alleged violations involving petition entities are heard and adjudicated shall be governed by the "State Administrative Procedure Act", article 4 of title 24, C.R.S. If a complaint is filed with the secretary of state pursuant to section 1-40-132 (1) alleging that a petition entity was not licensed when it compensated any circulator, the secretary may use information that the entity is required to produce pursuant to section 1-40-121 and any other information to which the secretary may reasonably gain access, including documentation produced pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection (2) of this section, at a hearing. After a hearing is held, if a violation is determined to have occurred, such petition entity shall be fined by the secretary in an amount not to exceed one hundred dollars per circulator for each day that the named individual or individuals circulated petition sections on behalf of the unlicensed petition entity. If the secretary finds that a petition entity violated a provision of paragraph (c) of subsection (2) of this section, the secretary shall revoke the entity's license for not less than ninety days or more than one hundred eighty days. Upon finding any subsequent violation of a provision of paragraph (c) of subsection (2) of this section, the secretary shall revoke the petition entity's license for not less than one hundred eighty days or more than one year. The secretary shall consider all circumstances surrounding the violations in fixing the length of the revocations.

A petition entity whose license has been revoked may apply for reinstatement to be effective upon expiration of the term of revocation.

In determining whether to reinstate a license, the secretary may consider:

The entity's ownership by, employment of, or contract with any person who served as a director, officer, owner, or principal of a petition entity whose license was revoked, the role of such individual in the facts underlying the prior license revocation, and the role of such individual in a petition entity's post-revocation activities; and

Any other facts the entity chooses to present to the secretary, including but not limited to remedial steps, if any, that have been implemented to avoid future acts that would violate this article.

The name and signature of the designated agent of the petition entity for the proposed measure.

The secretary of state shall issue a decision on any application for a new or reinstated license within ten business days after a petition entity files an application, which application shall be on a form prescribed by the secretary. No license shall be issued without payment of a nonrefundable license fee to the secretary of state, which license fee shall be determined and collected pursuant to section 24-21-104 (3), C.R.S., to cover the cost of administering this section.

A licensed petition entity shall register with the secretary of state by providing to the secretary of state:

(I) The ballot title of any proposed measure for which a petition will be circulated by circulators coordinated or paid by the petition entity;

(II) The current name, address, telephone number, and electronic mail address of the petition entity; and

A petition entity shall notify the secretary of state within twenty days of any change in the information submitted pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (5).

Source:

L. 2009:

Entire section added, (HB 09-1326), ch. 258, p. 1179, § 18, effective May 15.

L. 2011:

(3)(a) amended, (HB 11-1072), ch. 255, p. 1106, § 7, effective August 10.

L. 2018:

(2)(b) and (2)(c)(V) repealed and IP(2)(c) and (2)(c)(IV) amended, (HB 18-1145), ch. 113, p. 808, § 5, effective August 8.

L. 2021:

(1) and IP(2)(a) amended, (2)(a)(I) repealed, and (2)(d) added, (SB 21-250), ch. 282, p. 1670, § 75, effective June 21.

Editor's note:

Section 85 of chapter 282 (SB 21-250), Session Laws of Colorado 2021, provides that the act changing this section applies to elections conducted on or after June 21, 2021.

Cross references:

(1) For the legislative declaration in the 2011 act amending subsection (3)(a), see section 1 of chapter 255, Session Laws of Colorado 2011.

(2) For the legislative declaration in HB 18-1145, see section 1 of chapter 113, Session Laws of Colorado 2018.

1-40-136. Bills enacted in the second regular session of the seventy-second general assembly that include an act subject to petition clause - legislative declaration.

The general assembly finds and declares that:

The second regular session of the seventy-second general assembly convened on January 8, 2020, and was scheduled to adjourn sine die on May 6, 2020, pursuant to section 8 of article V of the state constitution and Joint Rule 23 (d) of the joint rules of the senate and house of representatives, which deems the constitutional maximum for the legislative session of one hundred twenty calendar days to be one hundred twenty consecutive calendar days;

Joint Rule 44 (g) of the joint rules of the senate and house of representatives states that the "maximum of one hundred twenty calendar days . . . shall be counted as one hundred twenty separate working calendar days if the Governor has declared a state of disaster emergency";

On March 10, 2020, the governor declared a disaster emergency due to the presence of coronavirus disease 2019, known as "COVID-19", and the public health crisis necessitated the temporary adjournment of the second regular session of the seventy-second general assembly;

On March 16, 2020, concerned that any legislation enacted after May 6, 2020, could be subject to challenge if Joint Rule 44 (g) were deemed unconstitutional, the general assembly submitted an interrogatory to the Colorado supreme court;

On April 1, 2020, the Colorado supreme court found in In re: Interrogatory on House Joint Resolution 20-1006, 2020 CO 23 (Colo. 2020), that Joint Rule 44 (g) was constitutional. Consequently, once it reconvenes, the second regular session of the seventy-second general assembly may continue for the fifty-two remaining legislative days.

The governor has extended the declared disaster emergency several times, which will now expire thirty days from May 7, 2020, and it is likely that the governor's declared disaster emergency will be further extended; and

The second regular session of the seventy-second general assembly remained in temporary adjournment until it reconvened on May 26, 2020, which will be counted as the sixty-ninth legislative day. It is uncertain when the general assembly will adjourn sine die, but it could be as late as July 30, 2020, under Joint Rule 44 (g) or later if the body undertakes another temporary adjournment.

The general assembly further finds and declares that:

If a bill does not include a safety clause, it is subject to the people's referendum power under section 1 of article V of the state constitution, which provides that a person can file a referendum petition up to ninety days after a general assembly's adjournment sine die to place an act, or an item, section, or part of an act on the ballot at a general election;

When the seventy-second general assembly commenced its second regular session on January 8, 2020, and until it reconvened on May 26, 2020, the act subject to petition clause specified that if a referendum petition were filed against an act, or an item, section, or part of an act, it would be placed on the ballot for the November 2020 general election;

The act subject to petition clause implicates two interlocking issues, both of which have constitutional, statutory, and practical dimensions;

If a petition is filed within the ninety days allowed by the state constitution, the office of the secretary of state must validate the petition to determine if it is sufficient. Before the election, the office of the secretary of state must also certify the content of the ballot and county clerk and recorders must print and mail ballots in accordance with deadlines set forth in both state and federal law.

At the same time, the constitution requires legislative council staff to distribute the ballot information booklets, which includes an analysis of each measure placed on the ballot, at least thirty days before the election. This process also involves multiple steps.

Because of the delayed adjournment sine die due to COVID-19, there will not be sufficient time after the constitutional deadline to file petitions to meet the deadline in federal law for the distribution of ballots to uniformed and overseas citizens or the deadline in the state constitution for the distribution of the ballot information booklets for the 2020 general election on November 3;

Section 1 (4)(a) of article V of the state constitution specifies that "elections on measures initiated by or referred to the people of the state shall be held at the biennial regular general election". While under normal circumstances this is understood to mean the general election that follows the session of the general assembly that passed the bill, the constitution does not specify that the election be held at the next general election.

Because of the delayed adjournment sine die due to COVID-19, and the resulting inability to place bills referred by petition on the ballot for the 2020 general election, it is reasonable to interpret section 1 (4)(a) of article V of the state constitution to mean the November 2022 general election instead of the November 2020 general election;

Referencing the November 2022 general election instead of the November 2020 general election preserves the right of referendum, affords the ability to comply with the other statutory and constitutional deadlines for the November 2020 election, and avoids the uncertainty that might come with the risk of legal challenges if this issue is not addressed;

Amending the act subject to petition clause in each bill could require amending hundreds of pending bills and would require changing the act subject to petition clause in over seventy enacted bills; and

It is a more efficient solution to enact this section to address the issue for all bills enacted in the second regular session of the seventy-second general assembly.

The general assembly further finds and declares that:

The act subject to petition clause in bills that were pending or enacted prior to the temporary adjournment of the second regular session of the seventy-second general assembly on March 14, 2020, make reference to August 5, 2020, as the possible effective date of such bills if adjournment sine die was on May 6, 2020; and

Because the adjournment sine die of the second regular session of the seventy-second general assembly was delayed beyond May 6, 2020, this section is intended to reiterate that unless a later date is otherwise specified in the act, the effective date for any act, or an item, section , or part of an act with an act subject to petition clause is 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the ninety-day period after adjournment sine die, not August 5, 2020.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for any act, item, section, or part of an act that is enacted by bill with an act subject to petition clause during the second regular session of the seventy-second general assembly:

The act, item, section, or part of the act takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the ninety-day period after adjournment sine die of the second regular session of the seventy-second general assembly, unless a later date is otherwise specified in the act; and

Notwithstanding subsection (2)(a) of this section, if a referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the state constitution against such an act, item, section, or part of the act within the ninety-day period after adjournment sine die of the second regular session of the seventy-second general assembly, then the act, item, section, or part of the act will not take effect unless approved by the people at the general election to be held in November 2022 and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.

Source:

L. 2020:

Entire section added, (SB 20-209), ch. 227, p. 1109, § 1, effective July 2.